Illinois, session 104th, HB5490.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Sections 55.6a and 55.8 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/55.6a)7    Sec. 55.6a. Emergency Public Health Fund. 8    (a) Moneys in the Emergency Public Health Fund, subject to 9appropriation, shall be allocated annually as follows: (i) 10$300,000 to the University of Illinois for the purposes 11described in Section 55.6(c)(6) and (ii) subject to subsection 12(b) of this Section, all remaining amounts to the Department 13of Public Health to be used to make vector control grants and 14surveillance grants to the Cook County Department of Public 15Health (for areas of the County excluding the City of 16Chicago), to the City of Chicago health department, and to 17other certified local health departments. These grants shall 18be used for expenses related to West Nile Virus and other 19vector-borne diseases. The amount of each grant shall be based 20on population and need as supported by information submitted 21to the Department of Public Health. For the purposes of this 22Section, need shall be determined by the Department based 23primarily upon surveillance data and the number of positive   HB5490- 2 -LRB104 18405 BDA 31847 b1human cases of West Nile Virus and other vector-borne diseases 2occurring during the preceding year and current year in the 3county or municipality seeking the grant.4    (b) Beginning on July 1, 2027, the amount equal to 10 cents 5of every fee collected under paragraph (1.5) of subsection (a) 6of Section 55.8 of this Act shall be allocated to the 7Department of Public Health for a grant to the Illinois Lyme 8Association's Tick Research, Education, and Evaluation project 9(Blank).10(Source: P.A. 103-363, eff. 7-28-23.) 11    (415 ILCS 5/55.8)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1055.8)12    Sec. 55.8. Tire retailers. 13    (a) Any person selling new or used tires at retail or 14offering new or used tires for retail sale in this State shall:15        (1) beginning on June 20, 2003 (the effective date of 16    Public Act 93-32), collect from retail customers a fee of 17    $2 per new or used tire sold and delivered in this State, 18    to be paid to the Department of Revenue and deposited into 19    the Used Tire Management Fund, less a collection allowance 20    of 10 cents per tire to be retained by the retail seller 21    and a collection allowance of 10 cents per tire to be 22    retained by the Department of Revenue and paid into the 23    General Revenue Fund; the collection allowance for retail 24    sellers, however, shall be allowed only if the return is 25    filed timely and in the manner required by this Title XIV   HB5490- 3 -LRB104 18405 BDA 31847 b1    and only for the amount that is paid timely in accordance 2    with this Title XIV;3        (1.5) beginning on July 1, 2003 and before July 1, 4    2027, collect from retail customers an additional 50 cents 5    per new or used tire sold and delivered in this State; and, 6    beginning on July 1, 2027, collect from retail customers 7    an additional 60 cents per new or used tire sold and 8    delivered in this State; the money collected from this fee 9    shall be deposited into the Emergency Public Health Fund;10        (2) accept for recycling used tires from customers, at 11    the point of transfer, in a quantity equal to the number of 12    new tires purchased; and13        (3) post in a conspicuous place a written notice at 14    least 8.5 by 11 inches in size that includes the universal 15    recycling symbol and the following statements: "DO NOT put 16    used tires in the trash."; "Recycle your used tires."; and 17    "State law requires us to accept used tires for recycling, 18    in exchange for new tires purchased.".19    (b) A person who accepts used tires for recycling under 20subsection (a) shall not allow the tires to accumulate for 21periods of more than 90 days.22    (c) The requirements of subsection (a) of this Section do 23not apply to mail order sales nor shall the retail sale of a 24motor vehicle be considered to be the sale of tires at retail 25or offering of tires for retail sale. Instead of filing 26returns, retailers of tires may remit the tire user fee to   HB5490- 4 -LRB104 18405 BDA 31847 b1their suppliers of tires if the supplier of tires is a 2registered retailer of tires and agrees or otherwise arranges 3to collect and remit the tire fee to the Department of Revenue, 4notwithstanding the fact that the sale of the tire is a sale 5for resale and not a sale at retail. A tire supplier who enters 6into such an arrangement with a tire retailer shall be liable 7for the tax on all tires sold to the tire retailer and must (i) 8provide the tire retailer with a receipt that separately 9reflects the tire tax collected from the retailer on each 10transaction and (ii) accept used tires for recycling from the 11retailer's customers. The tire supplier shall be entitled to 12the collection allowance of 10 cents per tire, but only if the 13return is filed timely and only for the amount that is paid 14timely in accordance with this Title XIV.15    The retailer of the tires must maintain in its books and 16records evidence that the appropriate fee was paid to the tire 17supplier and that the tire supplier has agreed to remit the fee 18to the Department of Revenue for each tire sold by the 19retailer. Otherwise, the tire retailer shall be directly 20liable for the fee on all tires sold at retail. Tire retailers 21paying the fee to their suppliers are not entitled to the 22collection allowance of 10 cents per tire. The collection 23allowance for suppliers, however, shall be allowed only if the 24return is filed timely and in the manner required by this Title 25XIV and only for the amount that is paid timely in accordance 26with this Title XIV.   HB5490- 5 -LRB104 18405 BDA 31847 b1    (d) The requirements of subsection (a) of this Section 2shall apply exclusively to tires to be used for vehicles 3defined in Section 1-217 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, 4aircraft tires, special mobile equipment, and implements of 5husbandry.6    (e) The requirements of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) do 7not apply to the sale of reprocessed tires. For purposes of 8this Section, "reprocessed tire" means a used tire that has 9been recapped, retreaded, or regrooved and that has not been 10placed on a vehicle wheel rim.11(Source: P.A. 100-303, eff. 8-24-17.)